Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-716
Application of law of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a responding tribunal of this state:

(1) shall apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in this state and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

(2) shall determine the duty of support and the amount payable in accordance with the support guidelines established under section 42-364.16.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 16;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 56.